Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 1 Public Utilities Commission
39-1-27.7.
System reliability and least-cost procurement.

Least-cost procurement shall comprise system reliability and energy efficiency and conservation procurement, as provided for in this section, and supply procurement, as provided for in §

39-1-27.8

, as complementary but distinct activities that have as common purpose meeting electrical and natural gas energy needs in Rhode Island, in a manner that is optimally cost-effective, reliable, prudent, and environmentally responsible.

The commission shall establish not later than June 1, 2008, standards for system reliability and energy efficiency and conservation procurement that shall include standards and guidelines for:

System reliability procurement, including but not limited to:

Procurement of energy supply from diverse sources, including, but not limited to, renewable energy resources as defined in chapter 26 of this title;

Distributed generation, including, but not limited to, renewable energy resources and thermally leading combined heat and power systems, that is reliable and is cost-effective, with measurable, net system benefits;

Demand response, including, but not limited to, distributed generation, back-up generation, and on-demand usage reduction, that shall be designed to facilitate electric customer participation in regional demand response programs, including those administered by the independent service operator of New England (“ISO-NE”), and/or are designed to provide local system reliability benefits through load control or using on-site generating capability;

To effectuate the purposes of this division, the commission may establish standards and/or rates (A) For qualifying distributed generation, demand response, and renewable energy resources; (B) For net metering; (C) For back-up power and/or standby rates that reasonably facilitate the development of distributed generation; and (D) For such other matters as the commission may find necessary or appropriate.

Least-cost procurement, which shall include procurement of energy efficiency and energy conservation measures that are prudent and reliable and when such measures are lower cost than acquisition of additional supply, including supply for periods of high demand.

The standards and guidelines provided for by subsection (b) shall be subject to periodic review and as appropriate amendment by the commission, which review will be conducted not less frequently than every three (3) years after the adoption of the standards and guidelines.

To implement the provisions of this section:

The commissioner of the office of energy resources and the energy efficiency and resources management council, either jointly or separately, shall provide the commission findings and recommendations with regard to system reliability and energy efficiency and conservation procurement on or before March 1, 2008, and triennially on or before March 1 thereafter through March 1, 2028. The report shall be made public and be posted electronically on the website of the office of energy resources.

The commission shall issue standards not later than June 1, 2008, with regard to plans for system reliability and energy efficiency and conservation procurement, which standards may be amended or revised by the commission as necessary and/or appropriate.

The energy efficiency and resources management council shall prepare by July 15, 2008, a reliability and efficiency procurement opportunity report that shall identify opportunities to procure efficiency, distributed generation, demand response, and renewables and that shall be submitted to the electrical distribution company, the commission, the office of energy resources, and the joint committee on energy.

Each electrical and natural gas distribution company shall submit to the commission on or before September 1, 2008, and triennially on or before September 1 thereafter through September 1, 2028, a plan for system reliability and energy efficiency and conservation procurement. In developing the plan, the distribution company may seek the advice of the commissioner and the council. The plan shall include measurable goals and target percentages for each energy resource, pursuant to standards established by the commission, including efficiency, distributed generation, demand response, combined heat and power, and renewables. The plan shall be made public and be posted electronically on the website of the office of energy resources, and shall also be submitted to the general assembly.

The commission shall issue an order approving all energy-efficiency measures that are cost-effective and lower cost than acquisition of additional supply, with regard to the plan from the electrical and natural gas distribution company, and reviewed and approved by the energy efficiency and resources management council, and any related annual plans, and shall approve a fully reconciling funding mechanism to fund investments in all efficiency measures that are cost-effective and lower cost than acquisition of additional supply, not greater than sixty (60) days after it is filed with the commission.

Each electrical and natural gas distribution company shall provide a status report, which shall be public, on the implementation of least-cost procurement on or before December 15, 2008, and on or before February 1, 2009, to the commission, the division, the commissioner of the office of energy resources, and the energy efficiency and resources management council which may provide the distribution company recommendations with regard to effective implementation of least-cost procurement. The report shall include the targets for each energy resource included in the order approving the plan and the achieved percentage for energy resource, including the achieved percentages for efficiency, distributed generation, demand response, combined heat and power, and renewables, as well as the current funding allocations for each eligible energy resource and the businesses and vendors in Rhode Island participating in the programs. The report shall be posted electronically on the website of the office of energy resources.

Beginning on November 1, 2012, or before, each electric distribution company shall support the installation and investment in clean and efficient combined heat and power installations at commercial, institutional, municipal, and industrial facilities. This support shall be documented annually in the electric distribution company’s energy-efficiency program plans. In order to effectuate this provision, the energy efficiency and resource management council shall seek input from the public, the gas and electric distribution company, the commerce corporation, and commercial and industrial users, and make recommendations regarding services to support the development of combined heat and power installations in the electric distribution company’s annual and triennial energy-efficiency program plans.

The energy-efficiency annual plan shall include, but not be limited to, a plan for identifying and recruiting qualified combined heat and power projects, incentive levels, contract terms and guidelines, and achievable megawatt targets for investments in combined heat and power systems. In the development of the plan, the energy efficiency and resource management council and the electric distribution company shall factor into the combined heat and power plan and program, the following criteria: (A) Economic development benefits in Rhode Island, including direct and indirect job creation and retention from investments in combined heat and power systems; (B) Energy and cost savings for customers; (C) Energy supply costs; (D) Greenhouse gas emissions standards and air quality benefits; and (E) System reliability benefits.

The energy efficiency and resource management council shall conduct at least one public review meeting annually, to discuss and review the combined heat and power program, with at least seven (7) business days’ notice, prior to the electric and gas distribution utility submitting the plan to the commission. The commission shall evaluate the submitted combined heat and power program as part of the annual energy-efficiency plan. The commission shall issue an order approving the energy-efficiency plan and programs within sixty (60) days of the filing.

If the commission shall determine that the implementation of system reliability and energy efficiency and conservation procurement has caused, or is likely to cause, under or over-recovery of overhead and fixed costs of the company implementing the procurement, the commission may establish a mandatory rate-adjustment clause for the company so affected in order to provide for full recovery of reasonable and prudent overhead and fixed costs.

The commission shall conduct a contested case proceeding to establish a performance-based incentive plan that allows for additional compensation for each electric distribution company and each company providing gas to end-users and/or retail customers based on the level of its success in mitigating the cost and variability of electric and gas services through procurement portfolios.

The office of energy resources shall conduct a study and analysis of the electric and gas distribution company’s state energy efficiency programs that will examine implemented program and planned conservation measures and review and confirm the claimed energy savings. In carrying out this study, the office shall utilize a representative sample of different customer classes and measures that have and/or will be participating in the state energy efficiency programs. At a minimum, the study performed by the office of energy resources shall include the following in its scope of work:

Independently review and summarize the electric and gas distribution company process for incorporating results from completed evaluation studies into ongoing energy efficiency program reporting and implementation.

Conduct an independent review of gas and electricity efficiency programs, which may include billing analysis techniques. The scope and subjects of this analysis will be decided by the working group with input and advice from an independent consultant. The analysis will be conducted by a qualified independent consultant using industry accepted methods.

Review the data-collection practices, including metering equipment used; sampling frequency; sample sizes; and data validation procedures, and the methods for data analysis employed, as deemed appropriate by the independent evaluator.

Study results and recommendations will be presented to the public utilities commission and the energy efficiency and resource management council.

The office of energy resources shall consult with the working group in development of the request for proposals (RFP), and during the course of the study, including the preliminary study results. The working group shall be comprised of one representative from each of the following groups chosen by the office of energy resources:

Large commercial and industrial energy users;

Small business energy users;

Residential energy users;

Municipal and state energy users;

Low-income energy users;

Electric and gas distribution company; and

Energy efficiency and resource management council.

The office of energy resources, in consultation with the electric and gas distribution company and representatives referenced in subsection (g)(2), shall be authorized to hire an energy consulting company or firm to carry out the energy efficiency verification study. The costs associated with this study, including, but not limited to, those associated with the consultant or firm contract and reasonable administrative costs incurred by the office in the execution of subsection (g) of this section, shall be recoverable through the system benefit charge subject to commission approval. Funding shall be transferred from the electric and gas distribution utility to the office of energy resources upon request by the office.

The office of energy resources shall submit this report on or before October 30, 2019, to the governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house. The office and its selected energy consulting company or firm shall host two (2) public presentations on the preliminary and final results of the study.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 6; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 6; P.L. 2007, ch. 6, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 15, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 17, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 13; P.L. 2012, ch. 363, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 5; P.L. 2018, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 223, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 224, § 1, effective July 8, 2021.

39-1-27.7.1.
Revenue decoupling.

The general assembly finds and declares that electricity and gas revenues shall be fully decoupled from sales pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and further finds and declares that any decoupling proposal submitted by an electric distribution company as defined in §

39-1-2(a)(12)

or gas distribution company included as a public utility in §

39-1-2(a)(20)

that has greater than one hundred thousand (100,000) customers, shall be for the following purposes:

Increasing efficiency in the operations and management of the electric and gas distribution system;

Achieving the goals established in the electric distribution company’s plan for system reliability and energy efficiency and conservation procurement as required pursuant to §

39-1-27.7(d)

;

Increasing investment in least-cost resources that will reduce long-term electricity demand;

Reducing risks for both customers and the distribution company including, but not limited to, societal risks, weather risks, and economic risks;

Increasing investment in end-use energy efficiency;

Eliminating disincentives to support energy-efficiency programs;

Facilitating and encouraging investment in utility infrastructure, safety, and reliability; and

Considering the reduction of fixed, recurring customer charges and transition to increased unit charges that more accurately reflect the long-term costs of energy production and delivery.

Each electric distribution company as defined by §

39-1-2(a)(12)

and gas distribution company included as a public utility in §

39-1-2(a)(20)

having greater than one hundred thousand (100,000) customers shall file proposals at the commission to implement the policy set forth in subsection (a) of this section. The commission shall approve these proposals, provided they contain the features and components set forth in subsection (c) of this section, and that they are consistent with the intent and objectives contained in subsection (a) of this section. Actions taken by the commission in the exercise of its ratemaking authority for electric and gas rate cases shall be within the norm of industry standards and recognize the need to maintain the financial health of the distribution company as a stand-alone entity in Rhode Island.

The proposals shall contain the following features and components:

A revenue decoupling reconciliation mechanism that reconciles annually the revenue requirement allowed in the company’s base distribution-rate case to revenues actually received for the applicable twelve-month (12) period; provided that the mechanism for gas distribution shall be determined on a revenue-per-customer basis, in a manner typically employed for gas distribution companies in the industry. Any revenues over-recovered or under-recovered shall be credited to, or recovered from, customers, as applicable; and

An annual infrastructure, safety, and reliability spending plan for each fiscal year and an annual rate-reconciliation mechanism that includes a reconcilable allowance for the anticipated capital investments and other spending pursuant to the annual pre-approved budget as developed in accordance with subsection (d) of this section.

Prior to the beginning of each fiscal year, gas and electric distribution companies shall consult with the division of public utilities and carriers regarding their infrastructure, safety, and reliability spending plan for the following fiscal year, addressing the following categories:

Capital spending on utility infrastructure;

For electric distribution companies, operation and maintenance expenses on vegetation management;

For electric distribution companies, operation and maintenance expenses on system inspection, including expenses from expected resulting repairs; and

Any other costs relating to maintaining safety and reliability that are mutually agreed upon by the division and the company.

The distribution company shall submit a plan to the division and the division shall cooperate in good faith to reach an agreement on a proposed plan for these categories of costs for the prospective fiscal year within sixty (60) days. To the extent that the company and the division mutually agree on a plan, such plan shall be filed with the commission for review and approval within ninety (90) days. If the company and the division cannot agree on a plan, the company shall file a proposed plan with the commission and the commission shall review and, if the investments and spending are found to be reasonably needed to maintain safe and reliable distribution service over the short and long term, approve the plan within ninety (90) days.

The commission shall have the following duties and powers, in addition to its existing authorities established in this title:

To maintain reasonable and adequate service-quality standards, after decoupling, that are in effect at the time of the proposal and were established pursuant to §

39-3-7

.

The commission may exclude the low-income rate class from the revenue decoupling reconciliation-rate mechanism for either electric or gas distribution. The commission also may exclude customers in the large commercial and industrial rate class from the gas-distribution mechanism.

The commission may adopt performance incentives for the electric distribution company that provide a shared-savings mechanism whereby the company would receive a percentage of savings realized as a result of achieving the purposes of this section while the remaining savings are credited to customers.

The commission shall review and approve, with any necessary amendments, performance-based, energy-savings targets developed and submitted by the Rhode Island energy efficiency and resources management council. The performance-based targets shall also be used as a consideration in any shared-savings mechanism established by the commission pursuant to subsection (e)(3) of this section.

The Rhode Island energy efficiency and resources management council shall propose performance-based, energy-savings targets to the commission no later than September 1, 2010. The targets shall include, but not be limited to, specific energy kilowatt-hour savings overall and peak-demand savings for both summer and winter peak periods expressed in total megawatts as well as appropriate targets recommended in the opportunities report filed with the commission pursuant to §

39-1-27.7(d)(3)

. The council shall revise, as necessary, these targets on an annual basis prior to the reconciliation process established pursuant to subsection (c) of this section and submit its revisions to the commission for approval.

Reporting. Every electric distribution company, as defined in subsection (a) of this section, shall report to the governor, general assembly, division of public utilities and carriers, and public utilities commission on or before September 1, 2012. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following elements:

A comparison of revenues from traditional rate regulation and how the revenues have differed as part of an approved decoupling structure;

A summary of how the company is achieving the performance-based targets that may have been adopted pursuant to subsection (e)(4) of this section;

A summary of any shared savings the company may have received pursuant to the performance incentives authorized in subsection (e)(3) of this section;

A summary of how the company is achieving the service-quality standards required in subsection (e)(1) of this section;

An overview of how decoupling is impacting revenue stabilization goals that have resulted from decoupling; and

A summary of any customer education programs provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 15, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 451, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 452, § 1.

39-1-27.8.
Supply procurement portfolio.

Each electric distribution company shall submit a proposed supply procurement plan or plans to the commission not later than March 1, 2009, and each March 1 thereafter through March 1, 2018. The supply procurement plan or plans shall be consistent with the purposes of least-cost procurement and shall, as appropriate, take into account plans and orders with regard to system reliability and energy efficiency and conservation procurement. The supply procurement plan or plans will include the acquisition procedure, the pricing options being sought, and a proposed term of service for which standard-offer service will be acquired. The term of service may be of various, staggered term lengths and acquisitions may occur from time to time and for more than one supplier for segments of standard-offer load over different terms, if appropriate. There also may be separate procurement plans for residential and nonresidential classes or separate plans among nonresidential classes. All the components of the procurement plans shall be subject to commission review and approval. Once a procurement plan is approved by the commission, the electric distribution company shall be authorized to acquire standard-offer service supply consistent with the approved procurement plan and recover its costs incurred from providing standard-offer service pursuant to the approved procurement plan. The commission may periodically review the procurement plan to determine whether it should be prospectively modified due to changed market conditions. The commission shall have the authority and discretion to establish eligibility criteria by rate class, and approve special tariff conditions and rates proposed by the electric distribution company that the commission finds are in the public interest, including, without limitation: (1) Short- and long-term optional service at different rates; (2) Term commitments or notice provisions before individual customers leave standard-offer service; (3) Standard-offer service rates for residential or any other special class of customers that are different than the rates for other standard-offer customers; (4) Time of use commodity pricing for specified classes of customers, except residential customers; provided, however, that the commission may establish pilot programs for time of use commodity pricing for residential customers; and/or (5) Standard-offer service rates that are designed to encourage any class of customers to purchase supply directly from the market.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 6; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 6.

39-1-27.9.
Office of energy resources participation.

In any commission inquiry into, or examination of, matters that relate to or could potentially impact any programs, functions, or duties of the office of energy resources and/or the energy efficiency and resources management council, including, but not limited to, those programs, functions and duties pursuant to this chapter and chapters 140, 140.1, 140.2, and 141 of title 42, the office of energy resources and the energy resources council shall be deemed, upon the formal request of the office or the council as appropriate, to be an interested party for all purposes, and as such, shall receive all notices and may file complaints, institute proceedings, and participate as a party in administrative hearings.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 6; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 6; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 2.

39-1-27.10.
Electric and gas distribution companies required to file affordable energy plans.

On or before January 2, 2007, each gas and electric distribution company shall submit to the commission a plan for affordable energy for low-income households, including very low-income households as defined in § 42-141-2 [repealed]. The plan shall provide for the implementation of the affordable energy fund and shall include provisions for discounted distribution rates and customer charges; payments on arrearages and unpaid balances by low-income households; and energy efficiency and weatherization, to the extent that funding is allocated by the commissioner pursuant to § 42-141-5(d) [repealed]. Any amendments or revisions to the plan after December 1, 2007, shall provide for referral of eligible households, as appropriate, to community action agencies or other entities designated by the office of energy resources for weatherization assistance.

On or before April 30, 2007, the commission shall review the plan and issue an order with regard to the plan not later than May 31, 2007. The order shall be effective not later than November 1, 2007. The commission shall cause a review, and as appropriate an amendment, of the plan at least every three (3) years between July 1, 2007, and July 1, 2016.

On or before November 1, 2007, each gas and electric distribution company shall implement an affordable energy plan in accordance with the order of the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 6; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 6; P.L. 2007, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 66, § 1.

39-1-27.11.
Affordable gas for public housing authorities.

The commission shall authorize public housing authorities, created pursuant to chapter 25 or 26 of title 45, to participate in “business choice programs” provided the commission determines that the accounts are billed to and paid by a single housing provider; that the accounts are located on contiguous sites; that other applicable standards for program participation are met; and that such participation is reasonable and prudent.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 441, § 1.

39-1-27.12.
Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program Enhancement Plan.

The Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program Enhancement Plan (hereinafter “LIHEAP Enhancement Plan”) is hereby created to supplement the federal Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (“LIHEAP”) funding being received by customers of Rhode Island electric and gas distribution companies.

Within a period of time sufficient to accomplish the purposes of this section, but not longer than ninety (90) days after the effective date of this chapter, the department of human services shall develop a recommended monthly “LIHEAP enhancement charge” rate for the following year and make a filing with the commission pursuant to this chapter recommending rates. Thereafter annually, but no later than October 15 of each year, the department shall make filings with the commission to recommend the LIHEAP enhancement charge rates for each class of electric and natural gas distribution company customer for the following year.

A LIHEAP enhancement charge approved by the commission shall have the following limitations:

For electric distribution company customers, the charge shall not be more than ten dollars ($10.00) per year.

For natural gas distribution company customers, the charge shall not be more than ten dollars ($10.00) per year.

The total projected annual revenue for the LIHEAP enhancement plan through charges to all electric and natural gas distribution company customers shall not exceed seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000) and shall not be below six million five hundred thousand dollars ($6,500,000).

A minimum of five percent (5%) shall be allocated to provide assistance to customers who are seeking LIHEAP certification for the sole purpose of entering into an arrearage plan as defined in §

39-2-1(d)(2)

between April 15 and September 30 of each year. Such customers must be a homeless family or individual transitioning from a shelter into housing and who have provided documentation acceptable to the department of human services. Any funds remaining at the end of the fiscal year shall be available for the upcoming winter season.

The commission shall open a docket, to consider for approval, LIHEAP enhancement charge rates proposed by the department. In reviewing the recommended rates, the commission shall give due consideration to the recommendations of the department and the standards set forth in subsection (c). The commission shall issue a decision within sixty (60) days after said recommendations and report are filed with the commission establishing the enhancement plan charge rates.

The electric or gas distribution company shall use the funds collected through this enhancement plan charge to provide a credit to customers’ accounts that are receiving federal LIHEAP assistance payments in a manner determined by the department of human services. The department of human services shall designate to the gas- or electric distribution company the qualifying customer accounts and the amounts to be credited to those customer accounts, provided that the total amount to be credited to those accounts shall be fully funded by, and not exceed, the total amount collected through the enhancement plan charge. The electric or gas distribution company’s added administrative expenses to process the credit assignments provided to it by the department of human services will be recoverable either from the LIHEAP enhancement charge or through a separate charge approved by the public utilities commission.

As used in this section, “electric and natural gas distribution company” means a company as defined in §

39-1-2(a)(12)

, but not including the Block Island Power Company or the Pascoag Utility District.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 404, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 14, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 15.

39-1-27.13.
Alternative suppliers and purchase of receivables program.

The general assembly recognizes the importance of competitive choice in electric generation service.

The commission may implement a purchase of receivables program where the electric distribution company purchases the receivables of a nonregulated power producer at a discount rate that is then offset from the monthly payments the electric distribution company makes to the nonregulated power producer if the commission finds that the benefits of the program to ratepayers would exceed the costs to ratepayers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 108, § 1.

39-1-28.
Acceptance of grants.

The commission and the division are authorized and empowered to apply for and receive and accept, in the name of the state, grants, of property, money, and services and other assistance offered or made available to them by any person, any political subdivision or entity, or any other agency, governmental or private, including the United States or any of its agencies and instrumentalities, which they may use for any purpose in furtherance of their powers and duties; provided, however, that acceptance of any grant shall not make the state in any manner legally or equitably liable to the donor relative to the use of the grant. The grants received shall not be covered into the general fund of the state, but shall be kept by the general treasurer in a separate fund for the commission and division and shall be paid out by him or her only upon receipt of properly authenticated vouchers signed by the chairperson of the commission or the administrator as appropriate, without the necessity of appropriation or reappropriation by the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-1-29.
Proceedings before federal agencies — Cooperation with other agencies.

The administrator shall represent the state in proceedings before agencies of the federal government on all matters affecting public utility services rendered, or to be rendered, in this state, and shall participate with other governmental and private agencies in studying integration or coordination of power systems to achieve low generating and transmission costs and possible regionalization of regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 1.

39-1-30.
Zoning review — Approval of ordinances and regulations.

Every ruling, decision, and order of a zoning board of review and of a building, gas, water, health, or electrical inspector of any municipality affecting the placing, erection, and maintenance of any plant, building, wires, conductors, fixtures, structures, equipment, or apparatus of any company under the supervision of the commission, shall be subject to the right of appeal by any aggrieved party to the commission within ten (10) days from the giving of notice of the ruling, decision, or order. The commission, after hearing, upon notice to all parties in interest, shall, as speedily as possible, determine the matter in question, weighing the consideration of public convenience, necessity, and safety against the consideration of public zoning, and shall have jurisdiction to affirm or revoke or modify the ruling, decision, or order to make any order in substitution thereof. Every ordinance enacted, or regulation promulgated, by any town or city affecting the mode or manner of operation or the placing or maintenance of the plant and equipment of any company under the supervision of the commission, shall be subject to the right of appeal by any aggrieved party to the commission within ten (10) days from the enactment or promulgation. The commission, after a hearing, upon notice to all parties in interest, shall determine the matter giving consideration to its effect upon the public health, safety, welfare, comfort, and convenience.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 265, § 2; P.L. 1972, ch. 205, § 2.

39-1-30.1.
Validation of location of utilities.

The locations for all lines for the transmission or distribution of electric current or for the providing of audio or visual telephonic or telegraphic communication service heretofore acquired or constructed by public utilities as defined under §

39-1-2

, upon, along, under, or over the public ways and places of this state, and the locations for poles, piers, abutments, conduits, manholes, vaults, and other fixtures, including those jointly owned, necessary to sustain, protect, or operate the wires and cables of the lines, and actually in place on May 19, 1982, are hereby made lawful notwithstanding any deficiency in the proceedings relative to their location and erection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 427, § 2.

39-1-30.2.
Possession of land adverse to a utility.

No interest in real property of an electric distribution company, electric transmission company, gas, telephone, or water utility may be defeated or otherwise adversely affected by the use, possession, or occupancy of the real property by any person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-1-30.3.
Installation of public utility services for abutting owners on private ways authorized.

The owner, or owners, of real estate abutting on a private way who have by deed or by prescription existing rights of ingress and egress upon the way or other private ways, shall have the right to place, install, or construct in, on, along, under, and upon the private way or other private ways, poles and other appurtenances necessary for the transmission of electricity or telephone service, provided the facilities do not unreasonably obstruct the private way or other private ways, and do not interfere with or be inconsistent with the existing use by others of the way or other private ways; and, provided further, that such placement, installation, or construction is done in accordance with regulations, plans, and practices of the utility company that is to provide the electricity or telephone service. The agencies that provide the service shall comply with the rules and regulations of the public utilities commission. Any owner, or owners, may grant permission to a public utility company to enter upon the way or other private ways to place, install, repair, or relocate poles and other necessary appurtenances for the transmission of electricity or telephone service in accordance with the company or companies’ regulations, practices, and tariffs filed with the public utilities commission; provided, however, that no charge or added assessment shall be levied by the public utility company or companies against the owner or owners not connected to the service or services. Neither the person installing or repairing public utility facilities, nor the facilities, nor the electricity or telephone service transmitted shall be deemed to constitute a trespass upon the way or ways.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 353, § 1.

39-1-31.
Eminent domain.

Before exercising any power of condemnation, a company shall present a petition to the commission describing the land, right of way, easement, or other interest in property it proposes to acquire, and setting forth why it is necessary to acquire it by eminent domain. The commission shall set a time and place for hearing the petition and shall give notice as the commission deems the circumstances require. If the commission shall determine that the proposed taking is for the benefit of the people of the state, and that it is necessary in order that the petitioner may render adequate service to the public, and that the use to which the property taken will be put will not unduly interfere with the orderly development of the region and scenic development, it shall issue a certificate authorizing the company to proceed with condemnation.

Any company acquiring an interest in land through the provisions of subsection (a) shall indemnify and hold harmless any and all owners, present and future, of land in which any right of way, easement, or other interest is acquired from harm caused by operations of the acquiring company that cause injury of any kind to the person or property of another.

No insurance company shall cause an insured to be placed into a risk pool by virtue of the fact that an easement has been granted under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 195, § 1.